Hawaii statutes.
§321-30.1 Medical marijuana
registry and regulation special fund; established. (a) There is
established within the state treasury the medical marijuana registry and
regulation special fund. The fund shall be expended at the discretion of the
director of health:

(1) To establish and regulate a system of medical
marijuana dispensaries in the State;

(2) To offset the cost of the processing and issuance
of patient registry identification certificates and primary caregiver
registration certificates;

(3) To fund positions and operating costs authorized
by the legislature;

(4) To establish and manage a secure and confidential
database;

(5) To fund public education as required by
section 329D‑26;

(6) To fund substance abuse prevention and education
programs; and

(7) For any other expenditure necessary, consistent
with this chapter and chapter 329D, to implement medical marijuana registry and
regulation programs.

(b) The fund shall consist of all moneys
derived from fees collected pursuant to subsection (c) and section 329D-4.
There is established within the medical marijuana registry and regulation
special fund:

(1) A medical marijuana registry program sub-account,
into which shall be deposited all fees collected pursuant to subsection (c);
and

(2) A medical marijuana dispensary program
sub-account, into which shall be deposited all fees collected pursuant to
section 329D-4.

(c) The department, upon completion of the
transfer of the medical use of marijuana program, shall charge a medical
marijuana registration fee to qualifying patients of no more than $35. [L 2013,
c 177, §2; am L 2015, c 241, §4]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next